District of Columbia statutes.
29A-942

Repealed

Compliance with chapter; not in restraint of trade.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 490, ch. 397, § 42
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-942.
1981 Ed., § 29-1142.
1973 Ed., § 29-842.